West Virginia, session 2026, SB349.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Occupational Therapy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-28-7 of this code, relating to the Board of Occupational Therapy (continuing education and competence, 13 CSR 04), is authorized.